Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2952
Remedies for breach or anticipating repudiation of contract.

(1) A marketing contract may liquidate damages to be paid to a limited cooperative association for a breach or anticipatory repudiation of the marketing contract but only at an amount or at a formula that is reasonable in light of the actual or then anticipated harm caused by the breach or to be caused by the anticipatory repudiation. The provision may be enforced as liquidated damages and is not to be considered a penalty.

(2) If there is a breach or anticipatory repudiation of a marketing contract, the limited cooperative association may seek an injunction to prevent the further breach or an anticipatory repudiation of the contract and the specific performance of the contract.

(3) In the case of a marketing contract between a limited cooperative association and a patron member, the articles of organization or bylaws may also provide additional remedies for the remedies under subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

(4) Nothing in this section shall restrict a limited cooperative association from seeking any other remedy at law or equity in the enforcement of a marketing contract.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 52;

Laws 2008, LB848, § 13.